California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(d) In counties where the secretary finds that the sealer, because of lack of equipment, is unable or fails to perform the tests as required herein, the secretary may enter into a contract with the board of supervisors of each of those counties to perform the tests. Those contracts shall provide that the county shall pay the cost of those services based upon a uniform schedule of fees developed by the secretary. The fee schedule shall be based on the approximate cost of performing those services. The contracts shall also provide that the secretary shall periodically render a bill to each
 county so served for the cost of services rendered, and the auditor of the county so billed shall pay the charge in the same manner in which other claims against the county are paid.

(e) All fees collected under the provisions of this section shall be credited to the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 35.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12213.

Each sealer may, in the general performance of his duty, without formal warrant, enter or go into or upon, any stand, place, building or premises or stop any vendor, peddler, junk-dealer, driver of a coal, ice, delivery, or other wagon or vehicle, containing commodities for sale or delivery and, if necessary, require him to proceed with the commodity to some place which the sealer may specify for the purpose of making the proper tests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12214.

(a) Upon satisfactory evidence presented to the secretary that the county sealer of any county is guilty of neglect of duty, incompetence, or misconduct in office, the trial board hereinafter provided for shall hold a hearing or hearings at times and places that it shall provide.

(b) The secretary and the president of the voluntary association
 of the sealers of the state shall select an impartial third person who, with them, shall compose a county sealer’s trial board to determine whether the sealer is guilty of the charges presented.

(c) At least 10 days prior to the date of hearing, the secretary shall give notice in writing to the sealer of the time and place of hearing and any information as to the nature of the charges that will enable the sealer to make a defense thereto.

(d) At the hearing or hearings, the trial board shall hear evidence that is offered and thereafter, within 30 days, make an order dismissing the charges or an order disqualifying the sealer.

(e) In case the order disqualifies the sealer, the secretary shall forthwith revoke the sealer’s license and declare the office vacant and a copy of the order shall be immediately transmitted by
 the secretary to the board of supervisors and the auditor of the county in which the sealer held office.

(f) The license of a deputy sealer or inspector may be revoked in the same manner and for the same causes that a license of a sealer may be revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 36.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12215.

A county sealer who receives information or evidence indicating that any weighing or measuring device, parking meter, or other installation under the county sealer’s jurisdiction has been altered in such a way as to facilitate any type of fraud shall coordinate with the appropriate law enforcement authorities as needed in investigating and prosecuting the fraudulent activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 329, Sec. 1.   (AB 2307)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.1. Fees and Charges [12240. - 12246.]

12240.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the county board of supervisors, by ordinance, may charge an annual registration fee, not to exceed the county’s total cost of actually inspecting or testing the devices as required by law, to recover the costs of inspecting or testing weighing and measuring devices required of the county sealer pursuant to Section 12210, and to recover the cost of carrying out Section 12211.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the annual registration fee shall not exceed the amount set forth in subdivisions (f) to (r), inclusive.

(c) The county may collect the fees biennially, in which case they shall not exceed twice the amount of an annual registration
 fee. The ordinance shall be adopted pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 25120) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(d) Retail gasoline pump meters, for which the above fees are assessed, shall be inspected as frequently as required by regulation, but not less than once every two years.

(e) Livestock scales, animal scales, and scales used primarily for weighing feed and seed, for which the above fees are assessed, shall be inspected as frequently as required by regulation.

(f) For purposes of this section, the annual registration fee for a business that uses a commercial weighing or measuring device or devices shall consist of a business location fee, a department administrative fee, as specified in Section 12241, and a device fee, as specified in subdivisions (g) to (r),
 inclusive. The business location fee and device fee shall not exceed one hundred twenty dollars ($120) per business location, plus 100 percent of the maximum applicable device fee listed in subdivisions (g) to (r), inclusive.

(g) (1) For marinas, mobilehome parks, recreational vehicle parks, and apartment complexes, where the owner of the marina, park, or complex owns and is responsible for the utility meters, the device fee shall not exceed the following:

(A) For water submeters, six dollars ($6) per device per space or apartment.

(B) For electric submeters, three dollars ($3) per device per space or apartment.

(C) For vapor submeters, ten dollars ($10) per device per space or apartment.

(2) Marinas, mobilehome parks, recreational vehicle parks, and apartment complexes for which the above fees are assessed shall be inspected and tested as frequently as required by regulation.

(h) For weighing devices, other than livestock, with capacities of 10,000 pounds or greater, the device fee shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per device; for weighing devices, other than livestock scales, with capacities of at least 2,000 pounds but less than 10,000 pounds, the device fee shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per device.

(i) This section does not apply to farm milk tanks.

(j) A scale or device used in a certified farmers’ market, as defined by Section 113742 of the Health and Safety Code, is not required to be registered in
 the county where the market is conducted, if the scale or device has an unexpired seal for the current year, issued by a licensed California county sealer.

(k) For livestock scales with capacities of 10,000 pounds or greater, the device fee shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per device; for livestock scales with capacities of at least 2,000 pounds but less than 10,000 pounds, the device fee shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per device.

(l) (1) For liquefied petroleum gas (LPG) meters, truck mounted or stationary, the device fee shall not exceed one hundred eighty-five dollars ($185) per device.

(2) For compressed natural gas (CNG) and liquified natural gas (LNG) meters, truck mounted or stationary, the device fee shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75) per
 device in 2019, one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per device in 2020, and one hundred eighty-five dollars ($185) per device beginning in 2021.

(m) For wholesale and vehicle meters, the device fee shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75) per device.

(n) For computing scales and electronic counter scales interfaced with a cash register or any point-of-sale system, the device fee shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) per device. For purposes of this subdivision, a computing scale or interfaced electronic counter scale shall be a weighing device with a capacity of less than 100 pounds that indicates, through its indicator or a point-of-sale system indicator, the money value of any commodity weighed, at predetermined unit prices, throughout all or part of the weighing range of the scale. For purposes of this subdivision, the portion of the annual registration fee
 consisting of the business location fee and the device fees authorized by this subdivision shall not exceed the sum of one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) for each business location.

(o) For jewelry and prescription scales and scales marked as, or meeting the design and performance requirements of, a Class II weighing device, the device fee shall not exceed eighty dollars ($80) per device. For purposes of this subdivision, a jewelry or prescription scale or a scale marked as, or meeting the design and performance requirements of, a Class II weighing device shall be a scale that meets the specifications, tolerances, and sensitivity requirements established or adopted by the secretary applicable to those devices in accordance with Section 12107.

(p) For weighing devices, other than computing, interfaced electronic counter, jewelry, and prescription scales and scales marked as,
 or meeting the design and performance requirements of, a Class II weighing device, as defined in subdivisions (n) and (o), with capacities of at least 100 pounds but less than 2,000 pounds, the device fee shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50) per device.

(q) For vehicle odometers utilized to charge mileage usage fees in vehicle rental transactions or in computing other charges for service, including, but not limited to, ambulance, towing, or limousine services, the device fee shall not exceed sixty dollars ($60) per device.

(r) This section does not apply to odometers in rental passenger vehicles, as defined in Section 465 of the Vehicle Code, that are subject to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 1939.01) of Title 5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code. If a person files a complaint with the county sealer regarding the accuracy of a rental passenger vehicle odometer, the
 county sealer may charge a fee to the operator of the vehicle rental business sufficient to recover, but not to exceed, the reasonable cost of testing the device in investigation of the complaint.

(s) For vehicle odometers utilized to charge mileage usage fees in vehicle rental transactions involving nonpassenger vehicles that are not subject to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 1939.01) of Title 5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, the portion of the annual registration fee consisting of the business location fee and the device fee authorized pursuant to subdivision (q) shall not exceed the sum of three hundred forty dollars ($340) for each business location.

(t) For all other commercial weighing or measuring devices not listed in subdivisions (g) to (r), inclusive, the device fee shall not exceed twenty-six dollars ($26) per device. For purposes of this subdivision,
 the total portion of the annual registration fee consisting of the business location fee and the device fees authorized by this subdivision shall not exceed the sum of one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200), for each business location.

(u) For purposes of this section, a single business location is defined as:

(1) Each business location that uses one or more categories or types of commercial devices as set forth in subdivisions (g) to (p), inclusive, and in subdivision (t), that require the use of specialized testing equipment and that necessitates not more than one inspection trip by a weights and measures official.

(2) Each vehicle, except for those vehicles that are employed in vehicle rental transactions, in which one or more commercial devices is installed and used.

(3) (A) For vehicles that are employed in vehicle rental transactions and that are not subject to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 1939.01) of Title 5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, each business location at which vehicles are stored or maintained by a vehicle rental company for the purposes of renting vehicles to customers.

(B) A facility that meets all of the following criteria shall not be considered a business location for the purposes of this paragraph:

(i) The facility is not wholly, or in any part, owned, leased, or operated by the vehicle rental company.

(ii) The facility is not operated or staffed by an employee of the vehicle rental company.

(iii) The facility stores or maintains, on a temporary basis, vehicles at the location for customer convenience.

(C) If a person files a complaint with the county sealer regarding the accuracy of an odometer in a vehicle found or located at a facility described in subparagraph (B), the county sealer may charge a fee to the operator of the vehicle rental company sufficient to recover, but not to exceed, the reasonable cost of testing the device in investigation of the complaint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 575, Sec. 1.   (AB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 12246.)
-------------------------------------------

12241.

The secretary shall establish by regulation an annual administrative fee to recover reasonable administrative and enforcement costs incurred by the department for exercising supervision over and performing investigations in connection with the activities performed pursuant to Sections 12210 and 12211 and to recover reasonable costs incurred by the department for the safekeeping and certification of the state standards pursuant to Section 12304 and for certification services provided pursuant to Sections 12305 and 12310. This administrative fee shall be collected for every device registered with each county office of weights and measures, and paid to the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 73.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 12246.)
-------------------------------------------

12242.

The revenue from any fee charged pursuant to Section 12240 shall be deposited in the general fund of the county and used solely for the activities required by Sections 12210 and 12211.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1050, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 12246.)
-------------------------------------------

12243.

In addition to providing notice as otherwise required, before adopting an ordinance charging fees pursuant to Section 12240, the board of supervisors shall hold at least one public meeting, at which oral or written presentations can be made, as part of a regularly scheduled meeting. Notice of the time and place of the meeting, including a general explanation of the matter to be considered, and a statement that the information required by this section is available, shall be mailed at least 14 days prior to the meeting to any interested party who files a written request with the board of supervisors. Any written request for the mailed notices shall be valid for one year from the date on which it is filed unless a renewal request is filed. Renewal requests for the mailed notices shall be filed on or before April 1 of each year. The board of supervisors may establish a reasonable annual charge for sending the notices based on the estimated cost of providing that service. At least 10 days prior to the meeting, the board of supervisors shall make available to the public information indicating the amount of cost, or estimated cost, required to provide the service for which the fee is charged and the revenue sources anticipated to provide the service, including general fund revenues. If the fees create revenues in excess of actual cost, those revenues shall be used to reduce the fee creating the excess.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1245, Sec. 6.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 12246.)
-------------------------------------------

12244.

Any costs incurred by the board of supervisors in conducting the required meeting may be recovered from fees charged for the services which were the subject of the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1380, Sec. 4.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 12246.)
-------------------------------------------

12246.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 575, Sec. 2.   (AB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 2.1, commencing with Section 12240.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Standards of Weights and Measures [12300. - 12314.]

12300.

Contracts made within this State for work to be done or for anything to be sold or delivered by weight or measure shall be construed according to the common standards, or according to the weights and measures of the metric system authorized by Congress, as the contract provides.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.

No contract or pleading is invalid or subject to objection because the weights or measures expressed or referred to therein are weights or measures of the metric system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12303.

The state standards of weights and measures by which all state and county standards of weights and measures shall be tried, proved, and sealed include the following standards, provided the standards have been certified relative to national standards under the direction of the National Institute of Standards and Technology:

(a) Metrological standards provided by the United States.

(b) Metrological standards procured by the state.

(c) Metrological standards in the possession of county sealers.

(d) Metrological standards in
 the possession of laboratories certified to perform measurement services pursuant to Section 12314.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 71.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12304.

The department shall keep the standards of the state in a suitable laboratory location or, if transportable, shall maintain the standards under environmental conditions appropriate for maintaining the integrity of the unit of measure represented by the standard. The
 department shall have the standards directly certified by the National Institute of Standards and Technology or by any measurement assurance procedures approved by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 51.5.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.

The department shall use the standards of the state to certify similar standards and any dissimilar standards that are dependent on the values represented by the state standards. Copies of the standards that have been compared and certified against the state standards shall become working standards that shall be used in the certification, calibration, and sealing of county field standards, and in the certification, calibration, and sealing of measurement devices submitted by state and local government agencies or by industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 75.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12308.

The legislative body of each county shall, upon the appointment of a sealer provide copies of the State’s standards of weights and measures at county expense. These copies shall be verified and certified to by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

12309.

The department shall, at the request of the legislative body of any county, furnish copies of the standard weights and measures of the State at the expense of the county requesting them. It shall upon request of the legislative body of any county or upon the request of a sealer of any such county test and approve copies of the State’s standards of weights and measures procured by such county to be used by a county sealer.

Copies furnished under the provisions of this section or copies tested and approved shall be true and correct; shall be sealed and certified to; and stamped with the letter “C.” Such copies need not be of the same material or construction as the standards of the State and such copies may be furnished in any suitable materials or construction that the county requiring the same may specify, subject to the approval of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

12310.

The department, or a laboratory designated by the department that has been certified pursuant to Section 12314, shall certify the standards of the county sealers as often as may be deemed by the secretary to be
 necessary, based upon a review of statistical data resulting from previous certifications, but in no event shall the period of time between certifications exceed 10 years. In the absence of statistical data, standards shall be certified at least every two years. Sealers shall, upon the request of the department, deliver for testing those standards in their possession that are used in the discharge of their duties. Direct expenses incurred in the certification process shall be borne by the state or recovered pursuant to Section 12241, while any incidental expense, such as the cost of transportation, shall be borne by
 the county whose standards have been certified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 52.5.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12310.5.

The department shall, upon request, certify and verify the various types of standards of weights and measures used by industry in accordance with the standards certified by the National Institute of Standards and Technology, when such standards are submitted to the department for verification and certification.

The department shall establish a schedule of fees sufficient to cover the cost of furnishing such services. All money received under the provisions of this section shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the Department of Agriculture Fund to be expended by the department for the administration of the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 53.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12311.

Every sealer having knowledge that a county standard may be incorrect, regardless of the cause, shall notify the department of the condition, and shall, if deemed by the department to be necessary, arrange to have the standard in question retested, adjusted, or replaced.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 97, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

12312.

In any prosecution for a violation of any of the provisions of this division any copy of the standards of weights and measures of the State furnished, procured, and certified to under the provisions of this division, shall be admitted in evidence upon the trial as prima facie true and correct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12313.

The definitions of basic units of weight and measure, and the tables of weight and measure and weights and measures equivalents, as published by the National Institute of Standards and Technology are recognized and shall govern weighing and measuring equipment and transactions in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 54.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12314.

The department, by regulation, may establish criteria and procedures for certification of laboratories to perform measurement services that are determined by the secretary to be beyond the existing equipment capabilities of the department, or when warranted by financial or workload considerations.

The department shall recover actual costs for the certification of any laboratory from that laboratory.

The secretary may revoke or suspend any certification issued pursuant to this section for good cause. The secretary shall establish by regulation criteria to be used when revoking or suspending any certification on the basis of good cause. Any proceeding to revoke or suspend any
 certification shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the secretary shall have all the powers granted therein.

Measurements performed and standards certified by laboratories certified under the provisions of this section shall qualify as prima facie evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 37.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Weighing and Measuring Devices [12500. - 12519.]

12500.

As used in this chapter the following terms mean:

(a) “Weighing instrument” means any device, contrivance, apparatus, or instrument used, or designed to be used, for ascertaining weight and includes any tool, appliance, or accessory used or connected therewith.

(b) “Measuring instrument” means any device,
 contrivance, apparatus, or instrument used, or designed to be used, for ascertaining measure and includes any tool, appliance, or accessory used or connected therewith.

(c) “Correct” means any weight or measure or weighing, measuring, or counting instrument that meet all of the tolerance and specification requirements established by the secretary pursuant to Section 12107.

(d) “Incorrect” means any instrument that fails to meet all of the requirements of Section 12107.

(e) “Commercial purposes” include the determination of the weight, measure, or count of any commodity or thing that is sold on the basis of weight, measure, or count; or the determination of the weight, measure, or count of any commodity or thing upon which determination a charge for service is based. Devices used in a determination upon which a charge
 for service is based include, but are not limited to, taximeters, odometers, timing devices, parcel scales, shipping scales, and scales used in the payment of agricultural workers.

“Commercial purposes” do not include the determination of the weight, measure, or count of any commodity or thing that is performed within a plant or business as a part of the manufacturing, processing, or preparing for market of that commodity or thing, or the determination of charges for the transmission of letters or parcels of less than 150 pounds, except when that determination is made in the presence of the customer charged for the service, or the determination of the weight of any animal or human by a qualified health provider, California-licensed veterinarian, licensed physician and surgeon, or staff members within the business operations of, and under the supervision of, a California-licensed veterinarian or licensed physician and surgeon for the purposes of determining the
 appropriate dosage of any medication or medical treatment or the volume, duration, or application of any medical procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 55.5.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12500.5.

The secretary by rules and regulations shall provide for submission for approval of types or designs of weights, measures, or weighing, measuring, or counting instruments or devices, used for commercial purposes, and shall issue certificates of approval of such types or designs as he or she shall find to meet the requirements of this code and the tolerances and specifications thereunder.

It shall be unlawful to sell or use for commercial purposes any weight or measure, or any weighing, measuring, or counting instrument or device, of a type or design that has not first been so approved by the department; provided, however, that any such weight, measure, instrument, or device in use for commercial purposes prior to the effective date of this act may be continued in use unless and until condemned under the provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 38.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12500.6.

Notwithstanding Section 12500.5, the secretary may prohibit the sale or installation of any previously approved type or design of weight or measure or weighing, measuring, or counting instrument if the secretary determines the weight, measure, or instrument does not fulfill the purpose for which it was approved or that the weight, measure, or instrument is not identical to the approved type or design.

The secretary may initiate proceedings pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code to determine whether the approval should be revoked or modified, and to determine the period of time that the owner or user of any accurate device for which type approval has been revoked or modified may continue to use that device for commercial purposes, pending the replacement or modification of the device.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 39.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12500.8.

The secretary may enter into an agreement with the National Type Evaluation Program, a certification program of the National Council on Weights and Measures, and other weights and measures jurisdictions, to accept the certifications of each other for prototype examination purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 29.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

12500.9.

The secretary shall charge and collect an application fee and reasonable deposit from persons submitting devices for approval as required by Section 12500.5. Costs incurred by the department that exceed the deposit shall be charged and collected upon completion of all prototype-approval testing. The fees shall be based upon the following criteria:

(a) The moneys
 collected are intended to compensate the secretary for the costs of time, mileage, equipment, and administrative services expended in providing prototype-approval service.

(b) The secretary may compensate county sealers of weights and measures, other weights and measures jurisdictions, or private laboratories for furnishing equipment and assisting the department in conducting prototype-approval activities.

(c) The amount of compensation provided for in subdivision (b) shall be based upon actual time, mileage, and equipment costs, as determined by the secretary.

(d) The secretary may charge an annual administrative fee not to exceed reasonable costs incurred for the maintenance of type approval certificates in hard copy and electronic formats.

(e) The
 secretary may adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

(f) All fees collected under the provisions of this section shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 4.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

12500.10.

(a) A sealer shall cause to be removed from commercial usage any weighing, measuring, or counting instrument or device sold or used in violation of Section 12500.5. The instrument or device may be either seized or marked with a tag or other suitable device with the words “unapproved device”.

(b) Upon proof of compliance with Section 12500.5, the sealer shall remove the tag or device bearing the words “unapproved device”.

(c) If the owner or user of any weighing, measuring, or counting instrument or device
 marked “unapproved device” refused or neglected to have it brought into compliance with Section 12500.5 within 30 days after the instrument or device was so marked, it shall be subject to seizure by the sealer. Any instrument or device which has been seized by the sealer pursuant to this section shall be subject to disposition as ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction upon petition for a disposition order by the owner or by any person claiming an interest in the seized instrument or device. If no disposition order is issued within four years after the date of the seizure, that instrument or device shall be defaced, destroyed, or otherwise disposed of by the sealer. The sealer shall, immediately following the defacing, destruction, or disposal of that instrument or device, notify, in writing, the board of supervisors of the county in which the sealer is serving of that fact together with the name and address of the owner or user of the instrument or device.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 77, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12501.

Except as provided in Section 12502 and, with respect to odometers, as is provided in Section 12501.1, every person who, for commercial purposes, sells weights or measures or weighing instruments or measuring instruments shall, within one year before selling the same, cause such weights or measures or weighing instruments or measuring instruments to be sealed by a sealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 966.)
-------------------------------------------

12501.1.

Every person who uses, or intends to use, any weight or measure, or weighing or measuring instrument for commercial purposes shall, before using the same, cause them to be sealed by a sealer, unless they have been sealed before sale, in which case they may be used by the purchaser for the remainder of such period as is authorized in the regulations adopted by the secretary pursuant to Section 12212, or until they become “incorrect,” as
 defined in subdivision (d) of Section 12500.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an odometer that has been tested by the manufacturer may be used commercially without further test during the remainder of the inspection period adopted by the secretary for odometers, but shall not be used commercially thereafter until it has been sealed by a sealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 57.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12501.2.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this division, a sealer shall not be required to inspect, test or seal any scales or other weighing or measuring instruments to be sold for use or being used for commercial purposes and so located that the testing standards, in the amount deemed necessary for the proper testing, cannot be brought to the instrument to be tested by customary means, whenever the owner or user thereof has not rendered the instrument in question more readily available for the purpose of permitting an accurate test to be made before the end of six months after notice in writing from the sealer requiring that better means of accessibility be provided for testing
 such instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 966.)
-------------------------------------------

12501.3.

Notwithstanding any other requirements or provisions of this division, a sealer may permit the use of an unsealed device pending repairs if the device is in error only to the disadvantage of the user and if the user is always the seller. Such an unsealed device shall be repaired within 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12502.

Any weighing or measuring instrument, which, after being sold and before being used for weighing or measuring, it is necessary to assemble or set up, may be sold without first being tested and sealed but shall be tested and sealed before being used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12503.

Upon a written request of any resident of a county, there appearing reasonable ground therefor, the sealer shall test or cause to be tested, as soon thereafter as is practicable, the weights, measures, or weighing or measuring instruments used for commercial purposes by the person designated in that request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 338, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12504.

Upon the written request of any person who intends to use or sell for commercial purposes any weight or measure, or weighing or measuring instrument in any county, the sealer for such county shall test or cause to be tested, as soon thereafter as is practicable, the weight or measure, or weighing or measuring instrument referred to in the request.

Such written request shall not relieve the person making it from any violation of the provisions of this division or of the responsibility for using or selling any incorrect or unsealed weight, measure, or weighing or measuring instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

12505.

Whenever a sealer examines any weight or measure or weighing, measuring, or counting instrument used for commercial purposes, and finds it to be correct, he or she shall seal or mark the weight, measure, or instrument with an appropriate device approved by the department, placed so as to provide optimum visibility to the customer, showing that the weight, measure, or instrument was inspected and indicating the date of the inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 338, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12506.

A sealer shall condemn and seize and may destroy incorrect weights and measures and weighing and measuring instruments used for commercial purposes, which in his or her best judgment are not susceptible of repair, but any which the sealer finds susceptible of repair, he or she shall cause to be marked with a tag or other suitable device with the words “Out of order.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 338, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12507.

The owners or users of any weights and measures or weighing or measuring instruments which have been marked “Out of Order,” shall have them repaired or corrected within 30 days, but until they have been repaired or corrected and tested the owners or users thereof may neither use nor dispose of them in any way.

In the event that the owner or user of any weights or measures or weighing or measuring instruments marked “Out of Order” shall have refused or neglected to have them repaired or corrected within thirty (30) days they shall be subject to seizure by the sealer. Any weights or measures or weighing or measuring instruments which
 have been seized by the sealer under the provisions of this section shall be subject to such disposition as shall be ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction upon petition for a disposition order by the owner or by any person claiming an interest in such seized equipment. If no such disposition order is issued within four years after the date of seizure, such equipment shall be defaced and destroyed or otherwise disposed of by the sealer. The sealer shall, immediately following the defacing, destruction or disposal of such weights or measures or weighing or measuring instruments, furnish the board of supervisors of the county in which the sealer is serving, with a list of the items so disposed of together with the name and address of the owner or user of each thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 953.)
-------------------------------------------

12508.
